South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the University of South Carolina, relating to Parking and Transportation Services, designated as Regulation Document Number 5412, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The University of South Carolina Parking and Transportation Services proposes to amend Chapter 119 to update the current regulations, so they reflect current university practices and make minor, technical updates. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 26, 2025. The proposed amendment will require legislative review. ----XX----